Missouri, session 2026, SB835.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 476.055, 478.003, 478.700, 488.426,
2
513.380, 513.430, 513.475, and 537.528, RSMo, are repealed and
3
eleven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
4
sections 379.135, 476.055, 478.003, 478.700, 488.426, 513.380,
5
513.423, 513.430, 513.475, 525.235, and 537.529, to read as
6
follows:
1
379.135. 1. Upon payment by an insurer of all or any
2
part of a cla i man t 's property damage claim, legal title to
3
the portion of the claim paid shall vest in the insurer to
4
the extent of such payment. No assignment or other action
5
by the claimant shall be re q uired for the insurer to enforce
6
its legal title. The claimant shall retain legal title only
7
to that portion o f the property damage claim not paid by the
8
insurer.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

2
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
9
2. As used in this section, "assignment agreement"
10
means a n y instrument by which post-loss benefits under any
11
policy of insurance covering property, including, but not
12
limited to, any right of action against the insurer or any
13
proceeds acquired from the insurer are assigned,
14
transferred, or acquired in any other manner, in whole or in
15
part, to or from a person providing services, including, but
16
not limited to, communicating with an insurer or on an
17
insured's behalf or inspecting, estimating, protecting,
18
repairing, restoring, or replacing the property or
19
mitigating against further damage to the property.
20
3. (1) A person shall not solicit or accept an
21
assignm e nt, i n whole or in part, of any post-loss insurance
22
benefit for property damage under a contract of insurance.
23
An assignment agreement is against public policy and is nu l l
24
and void, and any contract entered into in violation of this
25
section shall be void and unenforceable; and
26
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
27
to an as s ignment, transfer, pledge, or conveyance granted to
28
a financial institution, mortgagee, lienholder, or a
29
subsequent purchaser of the property; and
30
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
31
to any c o venant not to execute or contract to limit recovery
32
under section 537.065.
33
4. A violation of subsection 3 of this section shall
34
be cons i dered a level two violation under section 374.049.
35
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
36
prohibi t an insured from authorizing or directing payment
37
to, or paying, a person for services, materials, or any
38
other thing which may be, or is, covered under an insurance
39
policy. Insurers shall issue payment directly to a person
40
for ser v ices, materials, and other items that are covered

3
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
41
under an insurance policy, when the insured agrees that any
42
person providing such services should be paid directly,
43
subject to applicable liens.
1
476.055. 1. There is hereby established in the state
2
treasury the " Sta t ewide Court Automation Fund". All moneys
3
collected pursuant to section 488.027, as well a s gifts,
4
contributions, devises, bequests, and grants received
5
relating to statewide court automation [of judicial record
6
keeping], and moneys received by the [judicial system]
7
judiciary for the dissemination of information [and], sales
8
of publications, or other provision of electronic services
9
developed relating to statewide court automation [of
10
judicial record keeping], as authorized by the court
11
automation committee, shall be credited to the fund. Moneys
12
credited to this fund may only be used for the purpo s es set
13
forth in this section and as appropriated by the general
14
assembly. Any unexpended balance remaining in the statewide
15
court aut o mation fund at the end of each biennium shall not
16
be subject to the provisions of section 33.080 requiring the
17
transfer of such unexpended balance to general revenue.
18
2. The statewide court automation fund shall be
19
adminis t ered by a court automation committee consisting of
20
the following[: the chief justice of the supreme court,]
21
members:
22
(1) A judge from the court of appeals, four circuit
23
judges, f our associate circuit judges, four employees of
24
[the circuit court,] circuit courts, and two employees who
25
work full time in a municipal division of a circuit court,
26
[the commissioner of administration,] each of whom shall be
27
appointed by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme court;
28
(2) Two members of the Missouri Bar, appointed by the
29
board of governors of the Missouri Bar;

4
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
30
(3) Two members of the house of representatives
31
appointe d by the speaker of the house, with one member being
32
from the majority party and one member being from the
33
minority party;
34
(4) Two members of the senate appointed by the
35
presiden t pro [tem] tempore of the senate, with one member
36
being from the majority party and one member being from the
37
minority party; and
38
(5) Four additional ex officio members as follows:
39
(a) The chief justice of the Missouri supreme court,
40
or the c h ief justice's designee;
41
(b) The commissioner of administration, or the
42
commissi o ner's designee;
43
(c) The executive director of the Missouri [Office of
44
Prosecut i on Services,] office of prosecution services, or
45
the executive director's designee; and
46
(d) The director of the state public defender system,
47
[and two members of the Missouri Bar. The judge members and
48
employee members shall be appointed b y the chief justice.
49
The commissioner of administration shall serve ex officio .
50
The members of the Missouri Bar shall be appointed by the
51
board of governors of the Missouri Bar. Any member of the
52
committee may designate another person t o serve on the
53
committee in place of the committee member] or the
54
director's designee.
55
The appointed members of the committee shall serve for terms
56
of two years and until their successors are appointed and
57
qualified. The members of the committee shall be reimbursed
58
from the st atewide court automation fund for their actual
59
expenses in performing their official duties on the
60
committee.

5
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
61
3. The committee shall develop and [implement a plan
62
for] ma i ntain a statewide court automation system. The
63
committee shall have the authority to hire consult a nts,
64
review systems in other jurisdictions, and purchase goods
65
and services to administer the provisions of this section.
66
The committee may implement [one or more] pilot projects i n
67
the state [for the purposes of determining the feasibility
68
of developing and implementing such plan. The members of
69
the committee shall be reimbursed from th e court automation
70
fund for their actual expenses in performing their official
71
duties on the committee] at any time.
72
4. Any purchase of computer software or computer
73
hardwar e that exceeds five thousand dollars shall be made
74
pursuant to the requirements of the office of administration
75
for lowest and best bid. Such bids shall be subject to
76
acceptance by the office of administration. The court
77
automation committee shall determine the sp e cifications for
78
such bids.
79
5. The court automation committee shall not require
80
any cir c uit court to change any operating system in such
81
court, unless the committee provides all [necessary]
82
personnel, funds, and equipment necessary to effectuate the
83
required changes. No judicial circuit or county may be
84
reimbursed for any costs incurred pursuant to this
85
subsection unless such judicial circuit or county has the
86
approval of the court automation committee prior to
87
incurring the specific cost.
88
6. [Any] The court automation system, including any
89
pilot p r oject, shall be [implemented,] operated and
90
maintained in accordance with strict standards for the
91
security and privacy of confidential judicial records, as
92
provided by supreme court rule. Any person who knowingly

6
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
93
releases information from a confidential judicial record is
94
guilty of a class B misdemeanor. Any person who, knowing
95
that a judicial record is confid e ntial, uses information
96
from such confidential judicial record for financial gain is
97
guilty of a class E felony.
98
7. [On the first day of February, May, August and
99
Novembe r ] No later than the fifteenth of January of each
100
year, the court automation committee shall electronically
101
file a report on the progress of the statewide court
102
automation system with the chairs of the following
103
committees:
104
(1) The [chair of the] house budget committee, or its
105
successo r committee;
106
(2) The [chair of the] senate appropriations
107
committe e , or its successor committee;
108
(3) The [chair of the] house judiciary committee, or
109
its succ e ssor committee; and
110
(4) The [chair of the] senate judiciary committee, or
111
its succ e ssor committee.
112
[8. The court automation committee established
113
pursuant to this section may continue to function until
114
completion of its duties prescribed by this section.]
1
478.003. 1. In any judicial circuit of this state, a
2
majority of t h e j u dges of the circuit court may designate a
3
judge to hear cases arising in the circuit subject to the
4
provisions of sections 478.001 to 478.009. In lieu thereof
5
and subject to appropriations or other fun d s available for
6
such purpose, a majority of the judges of the circuit court
7
may appoint a person or persons to act as treatment court
8
commissioners. Each commissioner shall be appointed for a
9
term of four y e ars, but may be removed at any time by a
10
majority of the judges of the circuit court. The

7
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
11
qualifications, compensation, and retirement benefits of the
12
commissioner shall be the same as that of an associate
13
circuit judge. If the compensation of a commissioner
14
appointed purs u ant to this section is provided from other
15
than state funds, the source of such fund shall pay to and
16
reimburse the state for the actual costs of the salary and
17
benefits of the commissioner. The commissioner shall have
18
all the powers and duties of a circuit judge, except that
19
any order, judgment or decree of the commissioner shall be
20
confirmed or rejected by an associate circuit or circuit
21
judge by order of record entered within the time the judge
22
could set aside such order, judgment or decree had the same
23
been made by the judge. If so confirmed, the order,
24
judgment or decree shal l have the same effect as if made by
25
the judge on the date of its confirmation.
26
2. The Missouri supreme court may assign a treatment
27
court c o mmissioner to serve in the treatment court division
28
of a circuit other than the circuit in which the
29
commissioner is appointed. The transfer shall only be
30
ordered with the consent an d approval of the presiding judge
31
of the circuit to which the commissioner is to be assigned.
32
3. A treatment court commissioner may serve as a
33
commiss i oner in any treatment court as designated by the
34
treatment court coordinating commission, subject to local
35
court rules.
36
4. In each circuit having a treatment court division
37
that ha s neither a treatment court administrator nor a
38
treatment court commissioner, the court shall employ a
39
treatment court administrator, subject to appropriations or
40
other funds available for such purpose. If the compensation
41
of an administrator employed pursuant t o this subsection is
42
provided from other than state funds, the source of such

8
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
43
funds shall pay to and reimburse the state for the actual
44
costs of the salary and benefits of the administrator.
1
478.700. 1. There shall be [two] three circuit judges
2
in the twenty - fif t h judicial circuit [consisting of the
3
counties of Maries, Phelps, Pulaski and Texas]. These
4
judges shall sit in divisions numbered one [and ] , two, and
5
three. These judgeships shall include the circuit judgeship
6
create d in fiscal year 2026 under section 478.330.
7
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected
8
in 1980 . The circuit judge in division one shall be elected
9
in 1982. The circuit judge appointed by the governor in
10
2025 for division three shall serve until January 1, 2029.
11
A circuit judge for division three shall be elected in 202 8
12
for a four-year term and in 2032 for a full six-year term
13
and every six years thereafter.
1
488.426. 1. The judges of the circuit court, en banc,
2
in any circui t in this state may require any party filing a
3
civil case in the circuit court, at the time of filing the
4
suit, to deposit with the clerk of the court a surcharge in
5
addition to all other deposits required by law or court
6
rule. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to
7
proce e dings when costs are waived or are to be paid by the
8
county or state or any city.
9
2. The surcharge in effect on August 28, 2001, shall
10
remain i n effect until changed by the circuit court. The
11
circuit court in any circuit, except the circuit cou r t in
12
Jackson County, the circuit court in the city of St. Louis,
13
or the circuit court in any circuit that reimburses the
14
state for the salaries of family court commissioners under
15
and pursuant to section 487.020, may change the fee to any
16
amount not to exceed fifteen dollars. The circuit court in
17
Jackson County, the circuit court in t he city of St. Louis,

9
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
18
or the circuit court in any circuit that reimburses the
19
state for the salaries of family court commissioners under
20
and pursuant to section 487.020 may change the fee to any
21
amount not to exceed twenty dollars. A change in the fee
22
shall become effective and remain in effect until further
23
changed.
24
3. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to
25
proceed i ngs when costs are waived or are paid by the county
26
or state or any city.
27
[4. In addition to any fee authorized by subsection 1
28
of this s ection, any county of the first classification with
29
more than one hundred one thousand but fewer than one
30
hundred fifteen thousand inhabitants may impose an
31
additional fee of ten dollars excluding cases concerning
32
adoption and those in small claims court. The provisions of
33
this subsection shall expire on December 3 1, 2019.]
1
513.380. 1. [Whenever an execution against the
2
property of a n y j u dgment debtor, individual or corporate,
3
issued from any court in this state, shall be returned
4
unsatisfied, in whole or in part, by any sheriff or other
5
proper officer, the] A judgment creditor [in such execution,
6
his executor, administrator or assign, may,] shall upon
7
motion made at any time [within five years after such return
8
so made] before the judgment has been satisfied of record by
9
the judgment creditor and before the judgment being presumed
10
paid and satisfied under section 516.350, be entitled to an
11
order by the court rendering such judgment, requiring the
12
judgment debtor or, in the case of a corporate judgment
13
debtor, its chief officer to appear before such court at a
14
time and place in said order to be named, to undergo an
15
examination under oath touching his or her ability and means
16
to satisfy said judgment, and in case of neglect or refusal

10
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
17
on the part of such judgment debtor or, in the case of a
18
corporate debtor, its chief officer to obey such order, such
19
court is hereby authorized to issue a writ of attachment
20
against said debtor, as now provided by law, and to punish
21
him or, in the case of a corporate debtor, its chief officer
22
for contempt.
23
2. [Any prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney may
24
grant u s e immunity from prosecution to a judgment debtor for
25
any statement made at a judgment debtor's examination
26
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. Such
27
use immunity from prosecution shall protect such pe r son from
28
prosecution for any offense related to the content of the
29
statements made] For any statement made at a judgment
30
debtor's examination and conducted pursuant to subsection 1
31
of this section, a judgment debtor shall enjoy full use
32
immunity and derivative use immunity from prosecution
33
coextensive with their constitutional privilege against self-
34
incrimination. No testimony or other information directly
35
or indirectly d erived therefrom, compelled under subsection
36
1 of this section, may be used against the witness in any
37
criminal case, except a prosecution for perjury or giving a
38
false statement.
1
513.423. 1. On April 1, 2029, and on each three-year
2
interval endi n g o n April first thereafter, each dollar
3
amount in effect under sections 513.430 and 513.475 shall be
4
adjusted:
5
(1) To reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index
6
for All U rban Consumers, published by the United States
7
Department of Labor, or its successor index, for the most
8
recent three-year period ending immediately before January
9
first preceding such April first; and

11
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
10
(2) To round to the nearest twenty-five dollars the
11
dollar a m ount that represents such change.
12
2. Not later than March 1, 2029, and at each three-
13
year in t erval ending on March first thereafter, the revisor
14
of statutes shall publish a schedule of adjusted dollar
15
amounts, which will become effective on such April first,
16
annually in an appendix to the revised statutes of
17
Missouri. The revisor of statutes shall place a revisor's
18
note foll o wing section 513.430 or 513.475 referencing the
19
appendix of the adjusted dollar amount.
20
3. Adjustments made in accordance with subsection 1 of
21
this se c tion shall not apply with respect to cases commenced
22
before the date of such adjustments.
1
513.430. 1. The following property shall be exempt
2
from attachme n t a n d execution to the extent of any person's
3
interest therein:
4
(1) Household furnishings, household goods, wearing
5
apparel, appliances, books, animals, crops or musical
6
instruments that are held primarily for personal, family or
7
household use of such person or a dependent of such person,
8
not to exceed [three] fifteen thousand dollars in value in
9
the aggregate;
10
(2) A wedding ring not to exceed one thousand five
11
hundred d ollars in value and other jewelry held primarily
12
for the personal, family or household use of such person or
13
a dependent of such person, not to exceed [five] one
14
thousand seven hundred dollars in value in the aggregate;
15
(3) Any other property of any kind, not to exceed in
16
value [s i x] one thousand seven hundred dollars in the
17
aggregate;
18
(4) Any implements or professional books or tools of
19
the trad e of such person or the trade of a dependent of such

12
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
20
person not to exceed three thousand dollars in value in the
21
aggregate;
22
(5) Any motor vehicles, not to exceed [three] five
23
thousand dollars in value in the aggregate plus up to ten
24
thousand dollars of any unused amount of the exemption
25
provided under subdivision (1) of this subsection may be
26
allocated to a motor vehicle;
27
(6) Any mobile home used as the principal residence
28
but not a ttached to real property in which the debtor has a
29
fee interest, not to exceed [five] twelve thousand dollars
30
in value;
31
(7) Any one or more unmatured life insurance contracts
32
owned by such person, other than a credit life insurance
33
contract, and up to fifteen thousand dollars of any matured
34
life insurance proceeds for actual funeral, cremation, or
35
burial expenses where the deceased is the spouse, child, or
36
parent of the beneficiary;
37
(8) The amount of any accrued dividend or interest
38
under, o r loan value of, any one or more unmatured life
39
insurance contracts owned by such person under which the
40
insured is such person or an individual of whom such person
41
is a dependent; provided, however, that if proceedings under
42
Title 11 of the United States Code are commenced by or
43
against such person, the amount exempt in such proceedings
44
shall not exceed in value one hundred fifty thousand dollars
45
in the aggregate less any amount of property of such person
46
transferred by the life insurance company or fraternal
47
benefit society to itself in good faith if such transfer is
48
to pay a premium or to carry out a nonforfeiture insurance
49
option and is required to be so transferred automatically
50
under a life insurance contract with such company or society
51
that was entered into before commencement of such

13
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
52
proceedings. No amount of any accrued dividend or interest
53
under, or lo a n value of, any such life insurance contracts
54
shall be exempt from any claim for child support.
55
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, no such amount
56
shall be exempt in such proceedings under any such insurance
57
contract which was purchased by such person within one year
58
prior to the commencement of such proceedings;
59
(9) Professionally prescribed health aids for such
60
person o r a dependent of such person;
61
(10) Such person's right to receive:
62
(a) A Social Security benefit, unemployment
63
compensa t ion or a public assistance benefit;
64
(b) A veteran's benefit;
65
(c) A disability, illness or unemployment benefit;
66
(d) Alimony, support or separate maintenance, not to
67
exceed s e ven hundred fifty dollars a month;
68
(e) a. Any payment under a stock bonus plan, pension
69
plan, di s abi l ity or death benefit plan, profit-sharing plan,
70
nonpublic retirement plan or any plan described, defined, or
71
established pursuant to section 456.014, the person's right
72
to a participant account in any deferred compensation
73
program offered by the state of Missouri or any of its
74
political subdivisions, or annuity or similar plan or
75
contract on account of illness, disability, death, age or
76
length of service, to the extent reasonably necessary for
77
the support of such person and any dependent of such person
78
unless:
79
(i) Such plan or contract was established by or under
80
the ausp i ces of an insider that employed such person at the
81
time such person's rights under such plan or contract arose;
82
(ii) Such payment is on account of age or length of
83
service; a nd

14
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
84
(iii) Such plan or contract does not qualify under
85
Section 40 1 (a), 403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A or 409 of the
86
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, (26 U.S.C.
87
Section 401(a), 403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A or 409).
88
b. Notwithstanding the exemption provided in
89
subpara g raph a. of this paragraph, any such payment to any
90
person shall be subject to attachment or execution pursuant
91
to a qualified domestic relations order, as defined by
92
Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26
93
U.S.C. Section 414(p)), as amended, issued by a court in any
94
proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation
95
or a proceeding for disposition of property following
96
dissolution of marriage by a court which lacked personal
97
jurisdiction over the absent spouse or lacked jurisdiction
98
to dispose of marital property at the time of the original
99
judgment of dissolution;
100
(f) Any money or assets, payable to a participant or
101
benefici a ry from, or any interest of any participant or
102
beneficiary in, a retirement plan, profit-sharing plan,
103
health savings [plan] account, or similar plan, including an
104
inherited account or plan, that is qualified under Section
105
223, 401(a), 403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A or 409 of the
106
Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 223,
107
401(a), 403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A, or 409), as amended,
108
whether such participant's or beneficiary's interest arises
109
by inheritance, designation, appointment, or otherwise,
110
except as provided in this paragraph. Any plan or
111
arrangement described in this paragra p h shall not be exempt
112
from the claim of an alternate payee under a qualified
113
domestic relations order; however, the interest of any and
114
all alternate payees under a qualified domestic relations
115
order shall be exempt from any and all claims of any

15
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
116
creditor, other than the state of Missouri through its
117
department of social services. As used in this paragraph,
118
the terms "alternate payee" an d "qualified domestic
119
relations order" have the meaning given to them in Section
120
414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
121
Section 414(p)), as amended. If proceedings under Title 11
122
of the United States Code are commenced by or against such
123
person, no amount of funds shall be exempt in such
124
proceedings under any such plan, contract, or trust which is
125
fraudulent as defined in subsection 2 of section 428.024 and
126
for the period such person participated within three years
127
prior to the commencement of such proceedings. For the
128
purposes of this section, when the fraudulentl y conveyed
129
funds are recovered and after, such funds shall be deducted
130
and then treated as though the funds had never been
131
contributed to the plan, contract, or trust;
132
(11) The debtor's right to receive, or property that
133
is tracea b le to, a payment on account of the wrongful death
134
of an individual of whom the debtor was a dependent, to the
135
extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor
136
and any dependent of the debtor;
137
(12) Firearms, firearm accessories, and ammunition,
138
not to ex c eed one thousand five hundred dollars in value in
139
the aggregate;
140
(13) Any moneys accruing to and deposited in
141
individua l savings accounts or individual deposit accounts
142
under sections 166.400 to 166.456 or sections 166.500 to
143
166.529, subject to the following provisions:
144
(a) This subdivision shall apply to any proceeding
145
that:
146
a. Is filed on or after January 1, 2022; or

16
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
147
b. Was filed before January 1, 2022, and is pending or
148
on appe a l after January 1, 2022;
149
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this
150
subdivis i on, if the designated beneficiary of an individual
151
savings account or individual deposit account established
152
under sections 166.400 to 166.456 or sections 166.500 to
153
166.529 is a lineal descendant of the account owner, all
154
moneys in the account shall be exempt from any claims of
155
creditors of the account owner or designated beneficiary;
156
(c) The provisions of paragraph (b) of this
157
subdivis i on shall not apply to:
158
a. Claims of any creditor of an account owner as to
159
amounts contributed within a two-year period preceding the
160
date of the filing of a bankruptcy petition under 11 U.S.C.
161
Section 101 et seq., as amended; or
162
b. Claims of any creditor of an account owner as to
163
amounts contributed within a one-year period preceding an
164
execution on judgment for such claims against the account
165
owner.
166
2. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to
167
exempt f rom attachment or execution for a valid judicial or
168
administrative order for the payment of child support or
169
maintenance any money or assets, payable to a participant or
170
beneficiary from, or any interest of any participant or
171
beneficiary in, a retirement plan which is qualified
172
pursuant to Sections 408 and 408A of the Internal Revenue
173
Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sections 408 and 408A), as amended.
1
513.475. 1. The homestead of every person, consisting
2
of a dwelling hou s e and appurtenances, and the land used in
3
connection therewith, not exceeding the aggregate value of
4
[fifteen] forty thousand dollars, which is or shall be used
5
by such person as a homestead, shall, together with the

17
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
6
rents, issues and products thereof, be exempt from
7
attachment and execution. The exemption allowed under this
8
section shall not be allo w ed for more than one owner of any
9
homestead if one owner claims the entire amount allowed
10
under this subsection; but, if more than one owner of any
11
homestead claims an exemption under this section, the
12
exemption allowed to each of such owners shall not exceed,
13
in the aggregate, the total exemption allowed under this
14
subsection as to any one homestead.
15
2. Either spouse separately shall be debarred from and
16
incapab l e of selling, mortgaging or alienating the homestead
17
in any manner whatever, and every such sale, mortgage or
18
alienation is hereby declared null and void; provided,
19
however, that nothing herein contained shall be so construed
20
as to prevent the husband and wife from jointly conveying,
21
mortgaging, alienating or in any other manner disposing of
22
such homestead, or any part thereof.
1
525.235. 1. For purposes of this section, the term
2
"financial in s tit u tion" means a federally insured bank,
3
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union.
4
2. All orders of garnishment issued in this state for
5
the pur p ose of attaching to account funds on deposit held by
6
a financial institution shall be issued only under this
7
section and shall attach only to such funds held by the
8
financial institution on the date of service on the
9
financial institution, provided the effective date of
10
service shall be a banking day and provided service is made
11
prior to the financial institution's business cutoff time,
12
otherwise the service on the financial institution shall be
13
effective on the next banking day. If an account receives
14
electronic deposits of exempt prot e cted funds, including,
15
but not limited to, funds described under subdivision (10)

18
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
16
of subsection 1 of section 513.430, the attachment date for
17
such account shall be the date and banking day that the
18
financial institution applies for the federally required
19
look-back analysis to determine the protected amount. The
20
return date for orders of garnishment under this sect i on
21
shall not be less than thirty days from the effective date
22
of service.
23
3. All orders of garnishment issued in this state for
24
the pur p ose of attaching to account funds held by a
25
financial institution shall include the judgment debtor's
26
address and the last four digits of the debtor's tax
27
identification number, if known, and shall specify the
28
amount of funds to be withheld by the garnishee.
29
4. If an order of garnishment attaches to account
30
funds h e ld by a financial institution and the garnishee
31
holds funds of the judgment debtor in two or more accounts,
32
the garnishee may withhold payment of the amount attached
33
from any accounts belonging to a judgment debtor and such
34
accounts may have a different attachment date if necessary
35
for the federally required look-back analysis.
36
5. If an order of garnishment attaches to account
37
funds h e ld by a financial institution and the garnishee
38
holds funds of the judgment debtor in an account which the
39
judgment debtor owns in joint tenancy with one or more
40
individuals who are not subject to the garnishment, the
41
garnishee shall withhold the entire amount sought by the
42
garnishment. The garnishee shall provide a copy of the
43
order of garn ishment to each account holder within two
44
business days to the address provided to the garnishee by
45
each account holder by mail or electronically if authorized
46
by the account holder. Each account holder may file an
47
objection or request of exemption of all or a portion of the

19
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
48
account with the court that issued the order of garnishment
49
within thirty days of the date the garnishment attaches and
50
serve their objection or request for exemption on the
51
garnishor and the garnishee. If the objection or request of
52
exemption is not resolved wit hin thirty days of the timely
53
filing of the objection or request of exemption, the
54
garnishee may pay the garnished funds to the circuit court
55
to be held for pending resolution of the objection or
56
request.
57
6. No party shall seek an order of garnishment
58
attachi n g to account funds held by a financial institution
59
except on good faith belief of the party seeking garnishment
60
that the party to be served with the garnishment order has,
61
or will have, account assets of the judgment debtor. Except
62
as provided in this subsection, not more than one
63
garnishment shall be issued by a party seeking an order of
64
garnishment under this section for the same garnishee
65
applicable to the same claim or claims and against the same
66
judgment debtor in any thirty-day period. A judge may order
67
an exception to this subsection in any ca s e in which the
68
party seeking the garnishment shall in person or by attorney:
69
(1) Certify that the garnishment is not for the
70
purpose o f harassment of the debtor; and
71
(2) State facts demonstrating to the satisfaction of
72
the judg e that there is reason to believe that the garnishee
73
has property of the debtor which is not exempt from
74
execution.
75
7. No financial institution shall have a duty to
76
investi g ate or assert any defenses of a judgment debtor.
77
8. A financial institution served an order of
78
garnish m ent and interrogatories under this section shall
79
answer within twenty days. Funds shall be released to the

20
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
80
judgment debtor sixty days after an answer is submitted, or
81
sooner if required under an order to pay, or paid into the
82
court if objections are filed by the judgment debtor and the
83
financial institution is served with a copy of the
84
objections.
85
9. This section does not apply to wage garnishments or
86
to garn i shments of property other than account funds held by
87
a financial institution and a garnishment issued under this
88
section does not require a garnishee to search for, hold, or
89
return wages or other property. A garnishment under this
90
section does not require a garn i shee to report or hold or
91
respond to interrogatories not related to account funds.
92
10. This section does not limit the authority of a
93
garnisho r to obtain and issue an order of garnishment and
94
interrogatories for wages or for property, other than
95
account funds, held by a financial institution pursuant to
96
law and the rules of the Missouri supreme court.
97
11. (1) A garnishee acting in good faith compliance
98
with a fa cial l y valid order of garnishment under this
99
section shall not be liable to any debtor, creditor, or
100
other person for withholding, restraining, or releasing
101
funds in reasonable reliance upon the terms of the writ or
102
order.
103
(2) A garnishee shall not be required to:
104
(a) Adjudicate competing claims of ownership to
105
property or funds;
106
(b) Determine the legal sufficiency or validity of the
107
underlyi n g judgment; or
108
(c) Investigate facts outside the information
109
containe d in the writ or the garnishee's business records.
110
(3) A garnishee shall be liable for damages arising
111
from a g a rnishment only if:

21
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
112
(a) The garnishee fails to follow the clear and
113
express t erms of the writ or order;
114
(b) Such failure constitutes gross negligence or
115
willful m isconduct; and
116
(c) Actual damages are proven.
117
(4) A garnishee shall not be liable if the garnishee
118
corrects an error within five business days after receiving
119
written notice identifying the alleged error and promptly
120
releases any improperly restrained funds.
121
(5) Temporary restraint of funds pending review of a
122
claimed e xemption shall not create liability if the
123
garnishee, garnishor, and judgment debtor or other persons
124
act within time frames required by law.
125
12. The provisions of subsections 1 to 11 of this
126
section s hall be effective January 1, 2028.
127
13. The provisions of this section shall be
128
implemen t ed and administered in accordance with rules of the
129
Missouri supreme court.
1
537.529. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2
cited as the " Uni f orm Public Expression Protection Act".
3
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
4
(1 ) "Governmental unit", any city, county, or other
5
politica l subdivision of this state, or any department,
6
division, board, or other agency of any political
7
subdivision of this state;
8
(2) "Person", an individual, estate, trust,
9
partners h ip, business or nonprofit entity, governmental
10
unit, or other legal entity.
11
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of
12
this se c tion, the provisions of this section shall apply to
13
any cause of action asserted in a civil action against a
14
person based on the person's:

22
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
15
(1) Communication in a legislative, executive,
16
judicial , administrative, or other governmental proceeding;
17
(2) Communication on an issue under consideration or
18
review i n a legislative, executive, judicial,
19
administrative, or other governmental proceeding; or
20
(3) Exercise of the right of freedom of speech or of
21
the pres s , the right to assemble or petition, or the right
22
of association, guaranteed by the Constitution of the United
23
States or the Constitution of the state of Missouri, on a
24
matter of public concern.
25
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
26
cause o f action asserted:
27
(1) Against a governmental unit or an employee or
28
agent of a governmental unit acting or purporting to act in
29
an official capacity;
30
(2) By a governmental unit or an employee or agent of
31
a govern m ental unit acting in an official capacity to
32
enforce a law to protect against an imminent threat to
33
public health or safety; or
34
(3) Against a person primarily engaged in the business
35
of selli n g or leasing goods or services if the cause of
36
action arises out of a communication related to the person's
37
sale or lease of the goods or services.
38
As used in this subsection, the term "goods or services"
39
shall not include any dramatic, literary, musical,
40
political, journalistic, or artistic work.
41
5. No later than sixty days after a party is served
42
with a c omplaint, crossclaim, counterclaim, third-party
43
claim, or other pleading that asserts a cause of action to
44
which this section applies, or at a later time upon a

23
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
45
showing of good cause, a party may file a special motion to
46
dismiss the cause of action or part of the cause of action.
47
6. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
48
subsect i on:
49
(a) All other proceedings between the moving party and
50
respondi n g party in an action, including discovery and a
51
pending hearing or motion, are stayed on the filing of a
52
motion under subsection 5 of this section; and
53
(b) On motion by the moving party, the court may stay:
54
a. A hearing or motion involving another party if the
55
ruling o n the hearing or motion would adjudicate a legal or
56
factual issue that is material to the motion under
57
subsection 5 of this section; or
58
b. Discovery by another party if the discovery relates
59
to a le g al or factual issue that is material to the motion
60
under subsection 5 of this section.
61
(2) A stay under subdivision (1) of this subsection
62
remains i n effect until entry of an order ruling on the
63
motion filed under subsection 5 of this section and the
64
expiration of the time to appeal the order.
65
(3) If a party appeals from an order ruling on a
66
motion u n der subsection 5 of this section, all proceedings
67
between all parties in an action are stayed. The stay
68
remains in effect until the conclusion of th e appeal.
69
(4) During a stay under subdivision (1) of this
70
subsecti o n, the court may allow limited discovery if a party
71
shows that specific information is necessary to establish
72
whether a party has satisfied or failed to satisfy a burden
73
imposed by subdivision (1) of subsection 9 of this section
74
and is not reasonably available without discovery.

24
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
75
(5) A motion for costs and expenses under subsection
76
12 of th i s section shall not be subject to a stay under this
77
section.
78
(6) A stay under this subsection does not affect a
79
party's a bility to voluntarily dismiss a cause of action or
80
part of a cause of action or move to sever a cause of action.
81
(7) During a stay under this section, the court for
82
good cau s e may hear and rule on:
83
(a) A motion unrelated to the motion under subsection
84
5 of thi s section; and
85
(b) A motion seeking a special or preliminary
86
injuncti o n to protect against an imminent threat to public
87
health or safety.
88
7. (1) The court shall hear a motion under subsection
89
5 of th i s se c tion no later than sixty days after filing of
90
the motion, unless the court orders a later hearing:
91
(a) To allow discovery under subdivision (4) of
92
subsecti o n 6 of this section; or
93
(b) For other good cause.
94
(2) If the court orders a later hearing under
95
paragrap h (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
96
court shall hear the motion under subsection 5 of this
97
section no later than sixty days after the court order
98
allowing the discovery, subject to paragraph (b) of
99
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
100
8. In ruling on a motion under subsection 5 of this
101
section , the court shall consider the parties' pleadings,
102
the motion, any replies and responses to the motion, and any
103
evidence that could be considered in ruling on a motion for
104
summary judgment.

25
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
105
9. (1) In ruling on a motion under subsection 5 of
106
this se c tion , the court shall dismiss with prejudice a cause
107
of action or part of a cause of action if:
108
(a) The moving party establishes under subsection 3 of
109
this sec t ion that this section applies;
110
(b) The responding party fails to establish as
111
provided in subsection 4 of this section that this section
112
does not apply; and
113
(c) Either:
114
a. T he responding party fails to establish a prima
115
facie c a se as to each essential element of the cause of
116
action; or
117
b. The moving party establishes that:
118
(i ) The responding party failed to state a cause of
119
action u p on which relief can be granted; or
120
(ii) There is no genuine issue as to any material fact
121
and the pa rty is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on
122
the cause of action or part of the cause of action.
123
(2) A voluntary dismissal without prejudice of a
124
respondi n g party's cause of action, or part of a cause of
125
action, that is the subject of a motion under subsection 5
126
of this section does not affect a moving party's right to
127
obtain a ruling on the motion and seek costs, reasonable
128
attorney's fees, and reasonable litigation expenses under
129
subsection 12 of this section.
130
(3) A voluntary dismissal with prejudice of a
131
respondi n g party's cause of action, or part of a cause of
132
action, that is the subject of a motion under subsection 5
133
of this section establishes for the purpose of subsection 12
134
of this section that the moving party prevailed on the
135
motion.

26
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
136
10. The court shall rule on a motion under subsection
137
5 of thi s section no later than sixty days after the hearing
138
under subsection 7 of this section.
139
11. A moving party may appeal within twenty-one days
140
as a mat t er of right from an order denying, in whole or in
141
part, a motion under subsection 5 of this section.
142
12. On a motion under subsection 5 of this section,
143
the cour t shall award costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and
144
reasonable litigation expenses related to the motion:
145
(1) To the moving party if the moving party prevails
146
on the m o tion; or
147
(2) To the responding party if the responding party
148
prevails on the motion and the court finds that the motion
149
was frivolous or filed solely with intent to delay the
150
proceeding.
151
13. This section shall be broadly construed and
152
applied t o protect the exercise of the right of freedom of
153
speech and of the press, the right to assemble and petition,
154
and the right of association, guaranteed by the Constitution
155
of the United States or the Constitution of the state of
156
Missouri.
157
14. In applying and construing this section,
158
consider a tion shall be given to the need to promote
159
uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter
160
among states that enact it.
161
15. The provisions of this section shall apply to any
162
civil ac t ion filed, or any cause of action asserted in a
163
civil action, on or after August 28, 2026.
1
[537.528. 1. Any action against a person
2
for conduct or speech undertaken or made in
3
connection with a public hearing or public
4
meeting, in a quasi-judicial proceeding before a
5
tribunal or decision-making body of the state or

27
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
6
any political subdivision of the state is
7
subject to a special motion to dismiss, motion
8
for judgment on the pleadings, or motion for
9
summary judgment that shall be considered by the
10
court on a priority or expedited basis to ensure
11
the early consideration of the issues raised by
12
the motion and to prevent the unnecessary
13
expense of litigation. Upon the filing of any
14
special motion described in this subsection, all
15
discovery shall be suspended pending a decision
16
on the motion by the court and the exhaustion of
17
all appeals regarding the special motion.
18
2. If the rights afforded by this section
19
are raised as an affirmative defense and if a
20
court grants a motion to dismiss, a motion for
21
judgment on the pleadings or a motion for
22
summary judgment filed within ninety days of the
23
filing of the moving party's answer, the court
24
shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs
25
incurred by the moving party in defending the
26
action. If the court finds that a special
27
motion to dismiss or motion for summary judgment
28
is frivolous or solely intended to cause
29
unnecessary delay, the court shall award costs
30
and reasonable attorney fees to the party
31
prevailing on the motion.
32
3. Any party shall have the right to an
33
expedited appeal from a trial court order on the
34
special motions described in subsection 2 of
35
this section or from a trial court's failure to
36
rule on the motion on an expedited basis.
37
4. As used in this section, a "public
38
meeting in a quasi-judicial proceeding" means
39
and includes any meeting established and held by
40
a state or local governmental entity, including
41
without limitations meetings or presentations
42
before state, county, city, town or village
43
councils, planning commissions, review boards or
44
commissions.
45
5. Nothing in this section limits or
46
prohibits the exercise of a right or remedy of a
47
party granted pursuant to another
48
constitutional, statutory, common law or

28
CCS HCS SS SCS SBs 835 & 1111
49
administrative provision, including civil
50
actions for defamation.
51
6. If any provision of this section or the
52
application of any provision of this section to
53
a person or circumstance is held invalid, the
54
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
55
applications of this section that can be given
56
effect without the invalid provision or
57
application, and to this end the provisions of
58
this section are severable.
59
7. The provisions of this section shall
60
apply to all causes of actions.]
1
Section B. The enactment of section 513.423 and the
2
repeal and reen a ctment of sections 513.380, 513.430, and
3
513.475 of this act shall become effective on January 1,
4
2027.
